Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-12] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
declared severable. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next